Utah statutes.
17-21-21.   Ownership plats -- Use of geographic information systems or computer systems.

(1)  The county recorder shall prepare and keep ownership plats drawn to a convenient scale, which show the record owners of each tract of land in the county, together with the dimensions of the tract.

(2)  The county recorder may not be required to:

(a)  show ownership of timeshare units or timeshare estates on ownership plats; or

(b)  show lot or unit ownership on subdivisions or condominium plats or other ownership plats if that information is available through computer systems or other indexes.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter precludes the use of geographic information systems or computer systems by the recorder if the systems include all of the information required by this section.

